Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1906
Liability for removal.

Neither the owner, owner's agent, owner's employee, lessee, nor occupant of the premises from which any abandoned vehicle is removed, nor the state, city, village, or county, shall be liable for any loss or damage to such vehicle which occurs during its removal or while in the possession of the state, city, village, or county or its contractual agent, while in the possession of a private towing service, or as a result of any subsequent disposition.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB275, § 4.